src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UU_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kʼajúu - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UU_STEM_1

     kʼajúu+V+Sg+Impv: kʼajúu
     kʼajúu+V+Imm+Pres: kʼajúuga
     kʼajúu+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: kʼajúu
     kʼajúu+V+Simp+Pres: kʼajúugang
     kʼajúu+V+Dir+Past: kʼajúugan
     kʼajúu+V+Rel: kʼajúus
     kʼajúu+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: kʼajúugang
     kʼajúu+V+Pres+Hab: kʼajúuganggang
     kʼajúu+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: kʼajúugangang
     kʼajúu+V+Dir+Past+Hab: kʼajúugiinii
     kʼajúu+V+Interr+Past+Hab: kʼajúugaangaa
     kʼajúu+V+Indir+Past+Hab: kʼajúugaangaan
     kʼajúu+V+Interr+Fut+Long: kʼajúuäsaa
     kʼajúu+V+Interr+Fut+Short: kʼajúuäs
     kʼajúu+V+Simp+Fut: kʼajúuäsaang
     kʼajúu+V+Imm+Fut: kʼajúuäsga
     kʼajúu+V+Rel+Fut: kʼajúuäsaas
     kʼajúu+V+Fut+NonFact: kʼajúuäsaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: kʼajúuʼuuj
     kʼajúu+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: kʼajúuʼuujang
     kʼajúu+V+Res: kʼajúuäsaaʼuujang
     kʼajúu+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: kʼajúuʼus
     kʼajúu+V+Bias+Interr+Past: kʼajúuʼujaa
     kʼajúu+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼuujaangaa
     kʼajúu+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: kʼajúuäsaaʼus
     kʼajúu+V+Cert+Pres: kʼajúuʼahlanggang
     kʼajúu+V+Cert+Past: kʼajúuʼahlanggan
     kʼajúu+V+Cert+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼahlanggiinii
     kʼajúu+V+Cert+Fut: kʼajúuäsaaʼahlans
     kʼajúu+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kʼajúuäseehl
     kʼajúu+V+Pl+Impv: kʼajúuʼuu
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: kʼajúuʼwaa
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: kʼajúuʼwaa
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: kʼajúuʼwaang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Dir+Past: kʼajúuʼwägan
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Interr+Past: kʼajúuʼaawaa
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Indir+Past: kʼajúuʼaawaan
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Rel: kʼajúuʼwaas
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: kʼajúuʼaawaas
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+NonFact: kʼajúuʼwaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: kʼajúuʼaawaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: kʼajúugangʼwaa
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: kʼajúugangʼwaang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: kʼajúugangʼwaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼwägiinii
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼwägaangaa
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼwägaangaan
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: kʼajúuʼwaaäsaa
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: kʼajúuʼwaaäs
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaaäsaang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaaäsga
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaaäsaas
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: kʼajúuʼwaaäsaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Near+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: kʼajúuʼwaaʼuuj
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: kʼajúuʼwaaʼuujang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Res: kʼajúuʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: kʼajúuʼwaaʼus
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: kʼajúuʼwaaʼujaa
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaaäsaaʼus
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: kʼajúuʼwaaʼahlanggang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Cert+Past: kʼajúuʼwaaʼahlanggan
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: kʼajúuʼwaaʼahlans
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Ints+Past: kʼajúuʼaawaaʼahlang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Cont: kʼajúuʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: kʼajúuʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Rflx: kʼajúuʼwaaʼahl
     kʼajúu+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kʼajúuʼwaaäseehl
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: kʼajúuʼang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: kʼajúuʼangga
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: kʼajúuʼang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: kʼajúuʼanggang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Dir+Past: kʼajúuʼanggan
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Interr+Past: kʼajúuʼaangaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Indir+Past: kʼajúuʼaangaan
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Rel: kʼajúuʼans
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: kʼajúuʼaangaas
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+NonFact: kʼajúuʼangang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: kʼajúuʼaangaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: kʼajúuʼanggang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: kʼajúugangʼanggang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: kʼajúugangʼangang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼanggiinii
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼanggaangaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼanggaangaan
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: kʼajúuʼangäsaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: kʼajúuʼangäs
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: kʼajúuʼangäsaang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: kʼajúuʼangäsga
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: kʼajúuʼangäsaas
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: kʼajúuʼangäsaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: kʼajúuʼangʼuuj
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: kʼajúuʼangʼuujang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Res: kʼajúuʼangäsaaʼuujang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: kʼajúuʼangʼus
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: kʼajúuʼangʼujaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼangʼuujaangaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: kʼajúuʼangäsaaʼus
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: kʼajúuʼaangʼahlanggang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Cert+Past: kʼajúuʼaangʼahlanggan
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: kʼajúuʼangäsaaʼahlans
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: kʼajúuʼaangʼahlans
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Ints+Past: kʼajúuʼaangaaʼahlang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Cont: kʼajúuʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: kʼajúuʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Rflx: kʼajúuʼaangʼahl
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kʼajúuʼangäseehl
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: kʼajúuʼangʼuu
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: kʼajúuʼangʼwaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: kʼajúuʼangʼwaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: kʼajúuʼangʼwaang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: kʼajúuʼangʼwägan
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: kʼajúuʼangʼaawaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: kʼajúuʼangʼaawaan
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: kʼajúuʼangʼwaas
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: kʼajúuʼangʼaawaas
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: kʼajúuʼangʼwaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: kʼajúuʼangʼaawaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: kʼajúugangʼangʼwaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: kʼajúugangʼangʼwaang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: kʼajúugangʼangʼwaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼangʼwägiinii
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼangʼwägaangaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼangʼwägaangaan
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaäsaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaäs
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaäsaang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaäsga
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaäsaas
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: kʼajúuʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Res: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaʼus
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: kʼajúuʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: kʼajúuʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: kʼajúuʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaʼahl
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kʼajúuʼangʼwaaäseehl
